Alaska, session 34, HB315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 37.13.050(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) The Board of Trustees of the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation consists 07 of six members appointed by the governor. Two of the members must be heads of 08 principal departments of state government, one of whom shall be the commissioner of 09 revenue. Four members shall be appointed by the governor from the public and may 10 not hold any other state or federal office, position or employment, either elective or 11 appointive, except as a member of the armed forces of either the United States or of 12 this state. The public members of the board shall be separately confirmed by a 13 majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. 14 * Sec. 2. AS 37.13.050(b) is amended to read: 01 (b) The four public members of the board must be residents of this state and 02 have recognized competence and wide experience in finance, investments, or other 03 business management-related fields. 04 * Sec. 3. AS 37.13.060 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 37.13.060. Term of office. The public members of the board shall be 06 appointed for terms of six [FOUR] years, and they may be reappointed subject to 07 confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. The 08 terms of the public members shall be staggered so that not [NO] more than one term 09 of a public member expires each year. 10 * Sec. 4. AS 37.13.070(b) is amended to read: 11 (b) A vacancy on the board shall be [PROMPTLY] filled by appointment by 12 the governor within 30 days after the vacancy occurs and the appointee must be 13 confirmed by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. An 14 appointee to a vacancy shall hold office for the balance of the term for which the 15 appointee's predecessor on the board was appointed. If a vacancy occurs while the 16 legislature is not in session, the governor may appoint an interim board member 17 who shall exercise the powers of the board member until the next session of the 18 legislature, at which time the name of the interim board member shall be 19 presented to the legislature for confirmation. 20 * Sec. 5. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 21 read: 22 APPLICABILITY. (a) The changes to AS 37.13.050(a) and AS 37.13.050(b) made in 23 this Act do not apply to members of the Board of Trustees of the Alaska Permanent Fund 24 Corporation who are serving on the effective date of this Act. 25 (b) Members of the Board of Trustees of the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation 26 who are reappointed under AS 37.13.060 on or after the effective date of this Act shall be 27 confirmed by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. 28 * Sec. 6. This Act takes effect December 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.